it: Software > Software per computer > Software di intelligenza artificiale (IA).: Software di apprendimento automatico
zh-CN: 软件 > 电脑软件 > 人工智能 (AI) 软件: 机器学习软件
lt-LT: Programinė įranga > Kompiuterių programinė įranga > Dirbtinio intelekto (DI) programinė įranga: Mašininio mokymosi programinė įranga
pt-BR: Software > Software de computador > Software de Inteligência Artificial (IA): Software de aprendizado de máquina
sk-SK: Softvér > Počítačový softvér > Softvér umelej inteligencie (AI): Softvér strojového učenia
tr: Yazılım > Bilgisayar Yazılımları > Yapay Zeka (AI) Yazılımı: Makine Öğrenimi Yazılımı
zh-TW: 軟體 > 電腦軟體 > 人工智慧 (AI) 軟體: 機器學習軟體
ko: 소프트웨어 > 컴퓨터 소프트웨어 > 인공지능(AI) 소프트웨어: 머신 러닝 소프트웨어
th: ซอฟต์แวร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์คอมพิวเตอร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์ปัญญาประดิษฐ์ (AI): ซอฟต์แวร์ Machine Learning
sl-SI: Programska oprema > Računalniška programska oprema > Programska oprema za umetno inteligenco (UI): Programska oprema za strojno učenje
bg-BG: Софтуер > Компютърен софтуер > Софтуер за изкуствен интелект (AI): Софтуер за машинно обучение
pt-PT: Software > Software de computador > Software de Inteligência Artificial (IA): Software de aprendizagem de máquina
de: Software > Computersoftware > Künstliche Intelligenz(KI)-Software: Software für maschinelles Lernen
fr: Logiciels > Logiciels informatiques > Logiciel d’intelligence artificielle (IA): Logiciel de machine learning
pl: Oprogramowanie > Programy komputerowe > Oprogramowanie sztucznej inteligencji (AI): Oprogramowanie do uczenia maszynowego
hu: Szoftver > Számítógépes szoftver > Mesterséges intelligencia (AI) szoftver: Gépi tanulási szoftver
en: Software > Computer Software > Artificial Intelligence (AI) Software: Machine Learning Software
da: Software > Computersoftware > Software til kunstig intelligens (AI): Software til maskinel indlæring
ja: ソフトウェア > PCソフト > 人工知能 (AI) ソフトウェア: 機械学習ソフトウェア
fi: Ohjelmisto > Tietokoneohjelmisto > Tekoäly (AI) -ohjelmisto: Koneoppimisohjelmisto
ru: Программное обеспечение > Программное обеспечение для компьютеров > Программное обеспечение на базе искусственного интеллекта: Программное обеспечение для машинного обучения
hr-HR: Softver > Računalni softver > Softver za umjetnu inteligenciju (AI): Softver za strojno učenje
sv: Programvara > Datorprogramvara > Programvara för artificiell intelligens (AI): Programvara för maskininlärning
vi: Phần mềm > Phần mềm máy tính > Phần mềm trí tuệ nhân tạo (AI): Phần mềm học máy
cs: Software > Počítačový software > Software pro umělou inteligenci (AI): Software pro strojové učení
el: Λογισμικό > Λογισμικό υπολογιστών > Λογισμικό τεχνητής νοημοσύνης (AI): Λογισμικό μηχανικής μάθησης
nb: Programvare > Dataprogramvare > Programvare for kunstig intelligens (KI).: Programvare for maskinlæring
nl: Software > Computersoftware > Software voor kunstmatige intelligentie (AI).: Machine Learning-software
es: Software > Software informático > Software de inteligencia artificial (IA): Software de aprendizaje automático
ro-RO: Software > Software de calculator > Software pe bază de inteligență artificială (AI).: Software de învățare automată